test/src/gt-norm-yamls/morottaja-tests_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Noun - njamma: # â-stems Morottaja
    njamma+N+Sg+Nom: njamma
    njamma+N+Sg+Gen: njama
    njamma+N+Sg+Ill: njaaman
    njamma+N+Sg+Loc: njammaast
    njamma+N+Sg+Com: njammain
    njamma+N+Ess: njamman
    njamma+N+Pl+Abe: njamaittáá

  Noun - hattâ: # â-stems Morottaja
    hattâ+N+Sg+Nom: hattâ
    hattâ+N+Sg+Gen: haatâ
    hattâ+N+Sg+Ill: hattân
    hattâ+N+Sg+Loc: haađâst
    hattâ+N+Sg+Com: haađáin
    hattâ+N+Ess: hattân
    hattâ+N+Pl+Abe: hađâittáá

  Noun - čááná: # â-stems Morottaja
    čááná+N+Sg+Nom: čááná
    čááná+N+Sg+Gen: čáná
    čááná+N+Sg+Ill: čáánán
    čááná+N+Sg+Loc: čáánáást
    čááná+N+Sg+Com: čáánáin
    čááná+N+Ess: čáánnán
    čááná+N+Pl+Abe: čánáittáá

  Noun - spaha: # a-stems
    spaha+N+Sg+Nom: spaha
    spaha+N+Sg+Gen: spava
    spaha+N+Sg+Ill: spahan
    spaha+N+Sg+Loc: spavvaast
    spaha+N+Sg+Com: spavvaain
    spaha+N+Ess: spahhaan
    spaha+N+Pl+Abe: spavaittáá

  Noun - tuppâ: # â-stems 
    tuppâ+N+Sg+Nom: tuppâ
    tuppâ+N+Sg+Gen: tuupâ
    tuppâ+N+Sg+Acc: tuupâ
    tuppâ+N+Sg+Ill: tuupân
    tuppâ+N+Sg+Loc: [tuuppâst, tuupâst]
    tuppâ+N+Sg+Com: [tuppááin, tuppáin]
    tuppâ+N+Ess: tuppân
    tuppâ+N+Pl+Nom: tuupah
    tuppâ+N+Pl+Gen: [tuupâi, tupâi]
    tuppâ+N+Pl+Acc: [tuuppâid, tuupâid]
    tuppâ+N+Pl+Ill: [tuppááid, tuppáid]
    tuppâ+N+Pl+Loc: [tuuppâin,tuupâin]
    tuppâ+N+Pl+Abe: tupâittáá

  Noun - vuoli: # i-stems Morottaja
    vuoli+N+Sg+Nom: vuoli
    vuoli+N+Sg+Gen: vuoli
    vuoli+N+Sg+Ill: vuolin
    vuoli+N+Sg+Loc: vuolist
    vuoli+N+Sg+Com: vuolijn
    vuoli+N+Ess: vuollin
    vuoli+N+Pl+Abe: vuolijttáá

  Noun - ito: # â-stems Morottaja
    ito+N+Sg+Nom: ito
    ito+N+Sg+Gen: iđo
    ito+N+Sg+Ill: iton
    ito+N+Sg+Loc: iiđoost
    ito+N+Sg+Com: iiđooin
    ito+N+Ess: ittoon
    ito+N+Pl+Abe: iđoittáá

  Noun - vašo: # â-stems Morottaja
    vašo+N+Sg+Nom: vašo
    vašo+N+Sg+Gen: vašo
    vašo+N+Sg+Ill: vašon
    vašo+N+Sg+Loc: vaššoost
    vašo+N+Sg+Com: vaššooin
    vašo+N+Ess: vašsoon
    vašo+N+Pl+Abe: vašoittáá

  Noun - ákku: # u-stems Morottaja ja Olthuis
    ákku+N+Sg+Nom: ákku
    ákku+N+Sg+Gen: ááhu
    ákku+N+Sg+Acc: ￼ááhu
    ákku+N+Sg+Ill: áákun
    ákku+N+Sg+Loc: ￼ááhust
    ákku+N+Sg+Com: ￼áhhoin
    ákku+N+Sg+Abe: áhuttáá
    ákku+N+Pl+Nom: ááhuh
    ákku+N+Pl+Gen: ááhui
    ákku+N+Pl+Acc: ￼ááhuid
    ákku+N+Pl+Ill: ￼áhhoid
    ákku+N+Pl+Loc: ááhuin
    ákku+N+Pl+Com: ￼áhuiguin
    ákku+N+Pl+Abe: ￼áhuittáá
    ákku+N+Ess: ￼￼ákkun
    ákku+N+Par: ￼ákkud

  Noun - puttâl: # C stems Morottaja ja Olthuis
    puttâl+N+Sg+Nom: puttâl
    puttâl+N+Sg+Gen: puttâl
    puttâl+N+Sg+Acc: puttâl
    puttâl+N+Sg+Ill: puttâlân
    puttâl+N+Sg+Loc: puttâlist
    puttâl+N+Sg+Com: puttâláin
    puttâl+N+Sg+Abe: puttâlttáá
    puttâl+N+Pl+Nom: puttâleh
    puttâl+N+Pl+Gen: puttâlij
    puttâl+N+Pl+Acc: puttâlijd
    puttâl+N+Pl+Ill: puttâláid
    puttâl+N+Pl+Loc: puttâlijn
    puttâl+N+Pl+Com: puttâlijguin
    puttâl+N+Pl+Abe: puttâlijttáá
#    puttâl+N+Ess:￼ puttâlin
#    puttâl+N+Par: ￼puttâlid

  Noun - veeskir: # C stems Morottaja ja Olthuis
    veeskir+N+Sg+Nom: veeskir
    veeskir+N+Sg+Gen: viäs’kár
    veeskir+N+Sg+Acc: viäs’kár
    veeskir+N+Sg+Ill: viäs’kárân
    veeskir+N+Sg+Loc: viäs’kárist
    veeskir+N+Sg+Com: viäs’káráin
    veeskir+N+Sg+Abe: viäs’kárttáá
    veeskir+N+Pl+Nom: viäs’káreh
    veeskir+N+Pl+Gen: viäs’kárij
    veeskir+N+Pl+Acc: viäs’kárijd
    veeskir+N+Pl+Ill: viäs’káráid
    veeskir+N+Pl+Loc: viäs’kárijn
    veeskir+N+Pl+Com: viäs’kárijguin
    veeskir+N+Pl+Abe: viäs’kárijttáá
    veeskir+N+Ess: [viäs’kárin, ves’kirin]
    veeskir+N+Par: [viäs’kárid, ves’kirid]

  Noun - kappeer: # C stems Morottaja ja Olthuis
    kappeer+N+Sg+Nom: kappeer
    kappeer+N+Sg+Gen: kappeer
    kappeer+N+Sg+Acc: kappeer
    kappeer+N+Sg+Ill: kaperân
    kappeer+N+Sg+Loc: kaperist
    kappeer+N+Sg+Com: kaperáin
    kappeer+N+Sg+Abe: kappeerttáá
    kappeer+N+Pl+Nom: kapereh
    kappeer+N+Pl+Gen: kaperij
    kappeer+N+Pl+Acc: kaperijd
    kappeer+N+Pl+Ill: kaperáid
    kappeer+N+Pl+Loc: kaperijn
    kappeer+N+Pl+Com: kaperijguin
    kappeer+N+Pl+Abe: kaperijttáá
#    kappeer+N+Ess:￼￼ kaperin
#    kappeer+N+Par: kaperid

  Noun - naver: # C stems Morottaja ja Olthuis
    naver+N+Sg+Nom: naver
    naver+N+Sg+Gen: nahhaar
    naver+N+Sg+Acc: nahhaar
    naver+N+Sg+Ill: naharân
    naver+N+Sg+Loc: naharist
    naver+N+Sg+Com: naharáin
    naver+N+Sg+Abe: nahhaarttáá
    naver+N+Pl+Nom: nahareh
    naver+N+Pl+Gen: naharij
    naver+N+Pl+Acc: naharijd
    naver+N+Pl+Ill: naharáid
    naver+N+Pl+Loc: naharijn
    naver+N+Pl+Com: naharijguin
    naver+N+Pl+Abe: naharijttáá
    naver+N+Ess: ￼￼[naharin, naverin]
    naver+N+Par: ￼[naharid, naverid]
